Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1215
Motorboat; registration period already commenced; registration fee reduced; computation.

In the event an application is made after the beginning of any registration period for registration of any vessel not previously registered by the applicant in this state, the registration fee on such vessel shall be reduced by one thirty-sixth for each full month of the registration period already expired as of the date such vessel was acquired. The county treasurer shall compute the registration fee on forms and pursuant to rules of the commission.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB142, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 17.